Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9 On-premises Consumption
3-9-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Alcoholic beverages” means all intoxicating liquors of any sort, other than beer and wine as described and regulated in §§3-5-301 —3-5-307, and3-9-301 et seq., respectively;

(2)

“Bed and breakfast private club” means a corporation, partnership, individual, or limited liability corporation whose primary function is to provide overnight accommodations to the public, not exceeding a total of twenty (20) guest rooms on the premises, whether operated by the business owner or not, where the owner or a person representing the owner lives on the premises, where a breakfast meal is served to the lodging guest, and where no restaurant on the premises is open to the public except for the lodging guest;

(3)

“Board” means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board of this state, or its successor agency;

(4)

“City” means any city of the first class or city of the second class in this state;

(5)

“Director” means the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division;

(6)

“Dry area” means any area in which the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor is prohibited by a local option election heretofore or hereafter held pursuant to the Initiated Act;

(7)

“Guest” means a person who orders and is served a meal inside a restaurant during regular hours;

(8)

“Hotel” means every building or other structure commonly referred to as a hotel, motel, motor hotel, motor lodge, or by similar name, which is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and held out to the public to be a place where food is actually served and consumed and sleeping accommodations are offered for adequate pay to travelers or guests, whether transient, permanent, or residential, in which fifty (50) or more rooms are used for the sleeping accommodations of such guests, and having one (1) or more public dining rooms with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities, and a seating capacity for at least fifty (50) persons, where meals are regularly served to such guests, such sleeping accommodations and dining room being conducted in the same building or in separate buildings or structures used in connection therewith that are on the same premises and are a part of the hotel operation;

(9)

“Initiated Act” means Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, as amended, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, which establishes the procedure for local option elections to prohibit the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor;

(10)

“Large event facility” means a facility that houses convention center activity, tourism activity, trade show and product display and related meeting activity, or any other similar large meeting or attendance activity and that either itself or through one (1) or more independent contractors complies with all of the following:

(A)

Serves full and complete meals and food on the premises;

(B)

Has one (1) or more places for food service on the premises with a seating capacity for not fewer than five hundred (500) people; and

(C)

Employs a sufficient number and kind of employees to serve meals and food on the premises capable of handling at least five hundred (500) people;

(11)

“Meal” means the usual assortment of food commonly ordered at various hours of the day;

(12)

“On-premises consumption” means the sale of alcoholic beverages by the drink or in broken or unsealed containers for consumption on the premises where sold;

(13)

“Person” means any natural person, partnership, association, or corporation;

(14)(A)(i)

“Private club” means a nonprofit corporation organized and existing under the laws of this state, no part of the net revenues of which shall inure directly or indirectly to the benefit of any of its members or any other individual, except for the payment of bona fide expenses of the club's operations, and which is conducted for some common recreational, social, patriotic, political, national, benevolent, athletic, community hospitality, professional association, entertainment, or other nonprofit object or purpose other than the consumption of alcoholic beverages.

(ii)

The nonprofit corporation shall have been in existence for a period of not less than one (1) year before applying for a permit, as prescribed in this subchapter.

(iii)

At the time of application for the permit, the nonprofit corporation must have not fewer than one hundred (100) members and at the time of application must own or lease, be the holder of a buy-sell agreement or offer and acceptance, or have an option to lease a building, property, or space therein for the reasonable comfort and accommodation of its members and their families and guests and restrict the use of club facilities to those persons.

(B)

For purposes of this subdivision (14), a person shall be required to become a member of the private club in any wet area of the state only upon ordering an alcoholic beverage as defined under subdivision (1) of this section.

(C)

Furthermore, where the business entity that holds a private club permit additionally holds a retail beer permit, retail wine for consumption on the premises permit, or cafe or restaurant wine permit, the hours of operation authorized for the private club shall likewise apply to all permits of the business entity;

(15)

“Referendum election” means an election held as provided in this subchapter, at which the electors of a city or county shall vote on the question of authorizing, as provided herein, the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in those areas of the city or county in which the lawful sale of alcoholic beverages has not been prohibited by a local option election held pursuant to the Initiated Act; and

(16)

“Restaurant” means any public or private place:

(A)(i)

That is primarily engaged in the business of serving a meal for consumption on the premises to a guest and has a suitable kitchen facility to serve the entire menu approved by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

(ii)

The menu shall contain a selection of food and shall not be limited to sandwiches or salads.

(iii)

The kitchen shall:

(a)

Have adequate refrigeration to preserve the food on the menu;

(b)

Be kept in a sanitary condition; and

(c)

Comply with the rules of the Department of Health.

(iv)

Food from the menu shall be available from opening time until two (2) hours before closing time; or

(B)(i)

That qualifies as a “large meeting or attendance facility”, which is defined, without limitation, as a facility housing convention center activity, tourism activity, trade show and product display and related meeting activity, or any other similar large meeting or attendance activity and which either itself or through one (1) or more independent contractors complies with all of the following:

(a)

Actually serves full and complete meals and food on the premises;

(b)

Has one (1) or more places for food service on the premises with a seating capacity for not fewer than five hundred (500) people;

(c)

Employs a sufficient number and kind of employees to serve meals and food on the premises capable of handling at least five hundred (500) people; and

(d)

Serves alcoholic beverages on the premises at one (1) or more places only on days that meals and food are served at one (1) or more places on the premises.

(ii)

(a)

Any on-premises restaurant permittee as licensed by subdivision (16)(A) of this section and any hotel or motel on-premises permittee as licensed by subdivision (8) of this section shall be allowed to serve alcoholic beverages purchased under its permit at any large meeting or attendance facility which is licensed under this subdivision (16)(B). Hotel, motel, and restaurant permittees may serve alcoholic beverages purchased under their permits only when they have first secured written permission from the permittee of the large meeting or attendance facility. Otherwise, alcoholic beverage service at the large meeting or attendance facility shall be from inventory purchased by the large meeting or attendance facility permittee.

(b)

Written permission shall not be granted for more than a five-day period. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall be given a copy of any such written agreement. Any violations which occur while such permission is being used shall lie against the hotel, motel, or restaurant using such permission.

(c)

Any hotel, motel, or restaurant that serves its alcoholic beverages at a large meeting or attendance facility shall only do so pursuant to a satellite catering permit to be issued by the division for an annual fee of five hundred dollars ($500) per fiscal year or part thereof. The permit shall be applied for on forms as prescribed by the board.

(d)

The board shall promulgate such rules as it deems necessary to implement subdivisions (16)(B)(ii)

(a)

-

(c)

of this section.

(iii)

When a large attendance facilities permit has been issued to a government-owned facility located in a county that has a population of more than one hundred fifty-five thousand (155,000) according to the 2000 Federal Decennial Census, Arkansas-licensed beer wholesalers shall be allowed to pay for advertising devices used at the government-owned facility. Such advertising devices shall include items such as inside or outside signs, scoreboards, programs, scorecards, and the like. Provided, if such advertising by the beer wholesaler results in the formation or existence of an exclusive buying arrangement by the large attendance facilities permittee and the wholesaler who furnishes such items, then such an exclusive buying arrangement will be a violation of the large attendance facilities permit and the wholesale beer permit involved even if the arrangements are caused by third parties. To the extent that §3-5-214 or any other law could be interpreted to preclude such advertising arrangements allowed in this subdivision (16)(B)(iii), they are held inapplicable.

(iv)

(a)

When a large attendance facilities permit has been issued to a facility owned or operated by the owner of a professional sports team franchised by Minor League Baseball and within a county that has a population of more than one hundred fifty-five thousand (155,000) according to the 2000 Federal Decennial Census, the operator of the facility may accept sponsorship funds, advertising items, or promotional items from licensed beer wholesalers. Promotional items shall include items used by the facility to promote attendance.

(b)

However, if the use of sponsorship funds, advertising items, or promotional items by the beer wholesaler results in the formation or existence of an exclusive buying arrangement by the large attendance facilities permittee and the wholesaler who furnishes the sponsorship funds, advertising items, or promotional items, then the exclusive buying arrangement will be a violation of the large attendance facilities permit and the wholesaler's wholesale beer permit even if the arrangements are caused by third parties.

(c)

Section 3-5-214 or any other law that could be interpreted to preclude arrangements to use the sponsorship funds, advertising items, or promotional items allowed in this subdivision (16)(B)(iv) shall not apply to this subdivision (16)(B)(iv).

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 2; 1985, No. 384, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1402; Acts 1989, No. 295, § 3; 1989, No. 837, § 1; 1989, No. 953, § 1; 1993, No. 403, § 2; 1995, No. 536, § 2; 1995, No. 600, § 1; 1999, No. 1063, § 1; 1999, No. 1371, § 1; 1999, No. 1597, § 1; 2003, No. 369, § 1; 2003, No. 1813, § 1; 2005, No. 445, § 1; 2007, No. 642, § 1; 2011, No. 1194, § 2; 2013, No. 1100, §§ 1, 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 96, 97.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Since the 1989 amendments to present subdivision (8)(A) of this section were substantively the same and varied only in style, the subdivision as amended by Acts 1989, No. 837, § 1 has been set out.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “§3-5-214” for “§3-5-314” in (8)(B)(iii); and added (8)(B)(iv).

The 2007 amendment, in (8)(B), substituted “one hundred fifty-five thousand (155,000)” for “three hundred thousand (300,000)” in (iii) and (iv)(a), and substituted “2000” for “1999” in (iii).

The 2011 amendment added present (9).

The 2013 amendment redesignated and rewrote former (14) as (16); and inserted present (7) and (11) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (16)(A)(iii)

(c)

and (16)(B)(ii)

(d)

3-9-203. Applicability — Purpose and effect of referendum election.

(a)

The provisions of this subchapter authorizing on-premises consumption shall be effective only in cities and counties, or portions thereof, in which the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor is not prohibited as a result of a local option election held pursuant to Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, and in which the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption has been approved by a majority vote at a referendum election as herein provided.

(b)

A favorable vote at a referendum election shall authorize on-premises consumption in licensed premises, as provided in this subchapter, in only those areas of the city or county which are not dry areas.

(c)(1)

A referendum election held in a city shall be for the purpose of determining whether the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall be authorized in the portions of the city in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not otherwise prohibited by law.

(2)

A referendum election held in a county shall be for the purpose of determining whether the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall be authorized in all areas of the county, including cities of the first class and second class and incorporated towns therein, in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not otherwise prohibited by law.

(d)(1)

A property owner's association with a population of five thousand (5,000) or more or a county, city, or town may authorize by ordinance the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption under this subchapter if the property owner's association or the county, city, or town is located in or is a county that authorized the manufacture and sale of intoxicating liquor.

(2)

The authority of a county quorum court under subdivision (d)(1) of this section applies only to unincorporated areas of the county.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1403; Acts 2013, No. 1008, § 1; 2015, No. 383, § 1; 2017, No. 875, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment added (d).

The 2015 amendment added “property owner’s association with a population of five thousand (5,000) or more or a” to the beginning of (d); redesignated (d)(1) as part of (d) and deleted (d)(2); and inserted “the property owner’s association or a” preceding “city or town is located” in (d).

The 2017 amendment redesignated former (d) as (d)(1) and added (d)(2); in (d)(1), substituted “a county, city, or town” for “a city or town” following “(5,000) or more or”, substituted “the county, city, or town” for “a city or town” following “association or”, inserted “or is”, and deleted “after November 1, 2012” at the end.

3-9-204. Penalties.

(a)

Any person who shall violate any provision of §§3-9-201 —3-9-214,3-9-221 —3-9-225, and3-9-232 —3-9-237 shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(b)

Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

(c)

The Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to suspend, cancel, or revoke the permit of any permittee so convicted.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 16; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1416; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 336.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), inserted “Class A” and deleted “and upon conviction may be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and, in the discretion of the court, imprisoned for not more than six (6) months” from the end.

3-9-205. Rules — Police power of state and local governments.

(a)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board is authorized to adopt and enforce reasonable rules governing the qualifications for permits hereunder, the operation of licensed premises, and otherwise implementing and effectuating the provisions and purposes of this subchapter and, in so doing, shall be guided, insofar as pertinent, by rules now or hereafter applicable to retail liquor outlets.

(b)

Nothing in this subchapter, however, shall be construed as limiting the power of other proper state or local governmental bodies to regulate the operation of establishments under this subchapter as may be necessary for the protection of public health, welfare, safety, and morals.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 12; 1973, No. 387, § 1; 1975, No. 137, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1412; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 98.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” twice in (a).

3-9-206. Referendum elections — Conduct.

(a)

A referendum election hereunder shall be conducted in accordance with the following:

(1)

A referendum election may be called in a city by resolution adopted by a majority vote of the governing body of the city or by petition filed with the city clerk signed by qualified electors of the city numbering not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the votes cast in the city for the office of Governor in the last general election in which the office appeared on the ballot; or

(2)

A referendum election may be called in a county by resolution adopted by a majority vote of the quorum court at any annual or special session thereof, or by petition filed with the county clerk signed by qualified electors of the county numbering not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the votes cast in the county for the office of Governor in the last general election in which the office appeared on the ballot.

(b)(1)

The election shall be called by order of the quorum court in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq. and held and conducted in accordance with §7-11-201 et seq. and the results certified under the supervision of the county board of election commissioners in the manner provided by the election laws of this state.

(2)

The order of the quorum court shall fix the date of the election not more than ninety (90) days from the date of the order and give notice thereof by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or county by at least two (2) insertions, the last being not less than ten (10) days prior to the election.

(3)

The county board shall tabulate the votes and certify the results to the county clerk within ten (10) days after the election.

(c)

The election shall be conducted on a citywide or countywide basis. All qualified electors within the city or county, as the case may be, shall be eligible to vote even though they reside in a dry area thereof.

(d)

On the ballot for the election shall be printed substantially the following:

“FOR THE SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION IN (NAME OF CITY
OR COUNTY), ARKANSAS, AS AUTHORIZED IN ARKANSAS CODE §3-9-201 ET SEQ. AGAINST THE SALE OF ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR ON-PREMISES CONSUMPTION IN (NAME OF
CITY OR COUNTY), ARKANSAS, AS AUTHORIZED IN ARKANSAS CODE §3-9-201 ET SEQ.”.

Click to view table.

(e)

The results of the election may be contested within the time and in the manner provided by law.

(f)

All matters concerning the sufficiency of the petitions and the conduct of the election not specifically provided for herein shall be determined in accordance with the initiative and referendum laws of this state applicable to cities and counties, respectively.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1404; Acts 1997, No. 1010, § 5; 1997, No. 1060, § 5; 2001, No. 1475, § 5; 2005, No. 2145, § 2; 2007, No. 1049, § 3; 2009, No. 1480, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment added (b)(2)(B).

The 2007 amendment rewrote (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “§7-11-201 et seq.” for “§7-5-103(b)” twice in (b)(1).

3-9-207. Referendum elections — Effect.

(a)

In the event a majority of those voting in a referendum election under this subchapter shall vote for on-premises consumption, then permits may be issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board to eligible hotels and to restaurants located in other than dry areas of the city or county and which otherwise comply with the provisions of this subchapter.

(b)

In the event a majority of those voting in a referendum election under this subchapter shall vote against on-premises consumption, an election shall not be held again on the issue in the same voting district for a period of one (1) year. However, an adverse vote in a countywide election shall not prohibit the calling of an election in a city in such county, nor shall an adverse vote in a city election prohibit the calling of an election in the county.

(c)

Successive referendum elections may be held in the same city or county to reverse the result of a previous election. However, there shall be a period of not less than one (1) year between each such election.

(d)

After a referendum election has initially been held, subsequent elections in the same city or county shall be held at the regular biennial November general election.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1404.

3-9-208. Subsequent local option elections.

(a)

If a dry city or county shall subsequently vote at a local option election held pursuant to the Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, for the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors, a referendum election under this subchapter may not be held in such city or county for a period of six (6) months thereafter.

(b)

If a city or county has approved the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption and dry areas within the city or county thereafter vote for the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors at a local option election pursuant to the Initiated Act, a referendum election under this subchapter need not be held again in the formerly dry areas, but permits may not be issued for on-premises consumption in such areas for a period of one (1) year thereafter.

(c)

If permits are issued hereunder in a city or county which subsequently prohibits the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquors at a local option election pursuant to the Initiated Act, then all permits shall be deemed automatically revoked and shall be returned to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board forthwith.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1404.

3-9-209. Sales without permit prohibited.

It shall be unlawful and constitute a Class A misdemeanor for any person not holding a valid permit issued hereunder to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1415; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 194.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “Class A.”

3-9-210. Permit to sell beverages — Issuance.

(a)(1)

Any hotel or restaurant as defined in §3-9-202 desiring to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall make application to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division for a permit upon forms prescribed and furnished by the director and in accordance with the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board.

(2)(A)

If the hotel or restaurant is owned by a partnership, whether regular or limited, a nonpartner manager or operator may be issued the permit provided that he or she meets the other qualifications required by this section.

(B)

The failure of one (1) or more partners to be residents of this state shall not be grounds for denial of the permit.

(b)

No applicant shall be authorized to make any such sales until a permit is approved and issued by the director.

(c)

The board shall have authority to require an applicant, under oath, to disclose the following information:

(1)

The name of the applicant;

(2)

Location of the hotel or restaurant;

(3)

Sufficient data to establish that the applicant meets the requirements of §3-9-202;

(4)

The names and addresses of all owners of the hotel or restaurant;

(5)

That the applicant is a citizen or resident alien of the United States and a resident of Arkansas on the date of application, and if a corporation, duly qualified to do business in this state;

(6)

That neither the applicant nor any person to be employed in the serving of beverages authorized herein shall be a person who has been convicted within five (5) years of the date of his or her employment of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture, or transportation of intoxicating liquor, or convicted of a felony;

(7)

That the manager or operator of the hotel or restaurant seeking the permit is of good moral character and not a convicted felon; and

(8)

Such other relevant information as may be required.

(d)

Every permit issued under this subchapter shall be for an indeterminate period, subject to compliance with the annual renewal requirements herein prescribed and shall not be transferable or assignable, as to owner or premises, except upon the written approval of the director.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1405; Acts 1991, No. 606, § 7; 1997, No. 222, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 99.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 11, provided:

“It is the intent of this law to no longer require citizenship of the United States in order for a person to hold certain ABC licenses and to eliminate the requirement that persons be a resident of the State of Arkansas for two (2) years prior to the time that they make application for an ABC license. It is also the intent of this law that persons no longer be required to be registered voters in the county in which the permit is located and it is further intended that a person must either reside in the county where the premises is located or live within twenty-five (25) miles of the address of the permitted outlet. It is also the intent of this legislation that proof of payment of personal property taxes to the individual counties will no longer be required in order for a person to apply for or renew an ABC license. It is the further intent of this law that various application requirements regarding convicted felon status, status as it relates to violation of liquor laws of this state or any other state and revocation of permits shall be made uniform among various permits issued by the ABC Division. Therefore, any laws that may conflict with this act shall be and the same hereby are repealed.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(1).

3-9-211. Permit to sell beverages — Scope — Effect on other laws.

(a)

Any permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall include authority to sell beer for consumption on the same premises, and the provisions of §3-5-307(7) and (8) shall not apply to premises covered by a permit issued under this subchapter.

(b)

An on-premises consumption permit shall not authorize the selling or dispensing of alcoholic beverages by the package or bottle.

(c)(1)

Any permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall also include authority to sell native and imported wine by the drink.

(2)

However, nothing in this subchapter shall repeal subchapter 3 of this chapter regarding the licensing of restaurants to sell wines as authorized in those sections.

(3)

It is the intent hereof that a permit issued under this subchapter for sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall include authority to sell native or imported wines by the drink on the licensed premises, but any restaurant not wishing to obtain a license under this subchapter may obtain a license under subchapter 3 of this chapter to sell wines as authorized therein.

(d)

A permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption includes the authority to sell hard cider.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1417; Acts 2019, No. 691, § 21.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment added (d).

3-9-212. Permit to sell beverages — Fees.

(a)

Each application for a permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall be accompanied by a permit fee in the following applicable amount:

Hotel, having fewer than 100 rooms $ 750 Hotel, having 100 or more rooms 1,500 Restaurant, having a seating capacity of less than 100 persons 750 Restaurant, having a seating capacity of 100 or more persons 1,500 Large meeting or attendance facility as defined in §3-9-202(16)(B) 2,500.

Click to view table.

(b)

An annual renewal fee in the same amount as provided in subsection (a) of this section shall be paid to the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

(c)

The fee for a permit issued between January 1 and July 1 shall be one-half (½) of the applicable amount specified in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 7; 1983, No. 420, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-313.1, 48-1407; Acts 2009, No. 294, § 20.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “750” for “”500” twice, substituted “1,500” for “1,000” twice, and inserted “Large meeting or attendance facility as defined in §3-9-202(8)(B)” and “2,500.”

3-9-213. Gross receipts and supplemental taxes on sale of alcoholic beverages.

(a)

The sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this subchapter shall be subject to the Arkansas Gross Receipts Act of 1941, §26-52-101 et seq., as amended.

(b)(1)

In addition, there is levied a supplemental tax of ten percent (10%) upon the gross proceeds or gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this subchapter.

(2)(A)

In addition to the tax levied under subdivision (b)(1) of this section, a supplemental tax of four percent (4%) is levied on the gross proceeds or gross receipts from the sale of alcoholic beverages under this subchapter.

(B)

However, the tax levied under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section shall not apply to gross proceeds or gross receipts from the sale of beer or wine.

(c)(1)

The supplemental tax shall be reported and paid to the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration in the same manner and at the same time as the gross receipts tax and shall be subject to such reasonable rules as the secretary may prescribe, including the maintenance of permanent records showing all purchases and sales of alcoholic beverages.

(2)(A)

The tax levied under subdivision (b)(2) of this section shall be credited as special revenues to the University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund.

(B)(i)

The funds credited under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section shall be used exclusively for making loan repayments for construction projects authorized by Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 261, until the loan is paid in full.

(ii)

After the Chancellor of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences certifies in writing to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State that the loan has been repaid in full, then revenue from the tax collected under subdivision (b)(2) of this section may be used for any purpose authorized by law.

(d)

The taxes herein prescribed may be passed on to the consumer and shall be in lieu of all other special taxes at the retail level.

(e)

Wine shall not be defined as a mixed drink for the purposes of §§3-9-221 —3-9-225 and shall not be subject to the supplemental tax of twelve percent (12%).

(f)(1)

The Department of Finance and Administration shall notify the city or county of an audit for the supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises if:

(A)

The department audits a taxpayer;

(B)

The department makes an assessment related to the audit against the taxpayer; and

(C)

The taxpayer operates in a city or county that imposes a supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises under §3-9-214.

(2)

The city or county may use this information to administer its supplemental tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages consumed on the premises.

(3)

A city or county provided information under this subsection is subject to all of the confidentiality requirements of §26-18-303.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 8; 1983, No. 844, §§ 1, 5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-1408, 48-1408n; Acts 1999, No. 910, § 1; 2003, No. 335, § 1; 2005, No. 1274, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 100; 2019, No. 910, § 3349.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1274, § 1, amended subsection (b) of this section to change the supplemental tax from twelve percent (12%) to ten percent (10%) without also amending the reference to the twelve percent (12%) tax in subsection (e).

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (b) and (c) as present (b)(1) and (c)(1); in present (b)(1), substituted “ten percent (10%)” for “twelve percent (12%)” and deleted the former last sentence; and added (b)(2) and (c)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “secretary” for “director” twice in (c)(1).

3-9-214. Supplemental tax or fee on sales levied by political subdivisions.

(a)

An additional fee or supplemental tax as levied under §§3-9-212 and3-9-213 may also be levied upon any permittee under this subchapter by a city or incorporated town in which the licensed premises are located, or by the county if located outside the limits of a city or incorporated town.

(b)

However, in no event shall the fee or tax exceed the amount or rate provided in §§3-9-212 and3-9-213.

(c)

All fees and taxes levied hereunder shall be collected by the city or county and shall be used for city or county general purposes as authorized by law.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1409.

3-9-215. Authorization of Sunday sales on December 31.

When a Sunday falls on December 31 of any year, licensed restaurants and hotels authorized to sell alcoholic beverages under §3-3-210 may automatically sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption between the hours of 10:00 a.m. on Sunday and 2:00 a.m. on the following Monday unless the city, town, or county establishes by ordinance a lesser period of time within which alcoholic beverages may be sold for on-premises consumption by the licensed restaurants and hotels.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 115, §§ 1-3; 1995, No. 192, § 1; 1995, No. 563, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 1010, § 4; 1997, No. 1060, § 4; 2009, No. 294, § 21.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 192 became law without the Governor's signature.

Acts 1997, No. 1010 became law without the Governor's signature.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment deleted all the text of the section except (b)(2), which was redesignated as (a), inserted “authorized to sell alcoholic beverage under §3-3-210,” substituted “10:00 a.m.” for “12:00 noon,” inserted “town,” and made related and minor stylistic changes.

3-9-216. Authorization of sales for certain large attendance facilities and restaurants.

(a)

A large attendance facility under §3-9-202(16)(B) in which pari-mutuel wagering has been authorized and which has a valid and current license or permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption may sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption on any day of the week during hours in which the large attendance facility is open for business except on:

(1)

Christmas Day under §3-3-211; and

(2)(A)

Easter Sunday.

(B)

However, the large attendance facility may sell alcoholic beverages on Easter Sunday between the hours of 12:00 midnight and 2:00 a.m.

(b)

A restaurant under §3-9-202(16)(A) may sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption on Sundays between the hours of 12:00 midnight and 2:00 a.m. and on Sundays between the hours of 12:00 noon and 2:00 a.m. on the following Monday in addition to other times authorized by law for selling alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption if the restaurant:

(1)

Is located in the same city as a large attendance facility authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption on Sundays under subsection (a) of this section; and

(2)

Has a valid and current license or permit to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption.

(c)

This section does not:

(1)

Authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages in any city or county or in any portion of a city or county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is prohibited by law; or

(2)

Repeal or modify any law that prohibits the sale of intoxicating alcoholic liquor, beer, or wine on Sunday unless the law specifically conflicts with this section.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 1017, § 2; 2009, No. 7, § 1; 2009, No. 790, § 1; 2011, No. 982, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 7 inserted (b), and redesignated the following subsection accordingly.

The 2009 amendment by No. 790 rewrote (a); and made a minor stylistic change in (c).

The 2011 amendment substituted “alcoholic beverages” for “liquor” in (b)(1).